Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-942
Supplemental
retirement benefit; how computed.

For each person
who qualifies under sections 79-941 to 79-946, the retirement
board shall determine the value of the total monthly benefit being received
from the School Employees Retirement
System of the State of Nebraska or from the retirement system for Class V
districts as provided by the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. From
one hundred fifty-five dollars, the retirement board shall subtract the total
monthly benefit. Such difference, if positive, shall be the supplemental benefit
and shall be paid to the retired person each month from the School Retirement
Fund, except that if this difference is less than five dollars, a minimum
payment of five dollars per month shall be made to such person.

Laws 1980, LB 228, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 141, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1560;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 577;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 28.

Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.